Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-604
Officers; powers, duties, and compensation; regulate by ordinance; bond or insurance; premium.

The city or village may enact ordinances or bylaws to regulate and prescribe the powers, duties, and compensation of officers not herein provided for, and to require from all officers and servants, elected or appointed, bonds and security or evidence of equivalent insurance for the faithful performance of their duties. The city or village may pay the premium for such bonds or insurance coverage.

Laws 1879, § 69, XIII, p. 214;

Laws 1881, c. 23, § 8, XIII, p. 176;

Laws 1885, c. 20, § 1, XIII, p. 166;

Laws 1887, c. 12, § 1, XIII, p. 295;

R.S.1913, § 5146;

C.S.1922, § 4321;

C.S.1929, § 17-512;

R.S.1943, § 17-604;

Laws 1965, c. 68, § 1, p. 288;

Laws 2007, LB347, § 12.